Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5079.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 32-1-17 of the General Laws in Chapter 32-1 entitled "General
Provisions" is hereby amended to read as follows:
32-1-17. Persons with disabilities.
No fee shall be charged any person with a disability regardless of age, or to automobiles
transporting a non-driver with a disability, at any recreational facility owned and operated by the
state; provided, however, proper identification is presented as prescribed by the department of
environmental management. For the purpose of this section “person with a disability” shall mean
an individual who has a physical or mental impairment and is receiving:
(a) Social Receiving social security disability benefits (SSDI);
(b) Supplemental Receiving supplemental security income benefits (SSI); or
(c) Veterans Receiving veterans benefits and who shall be determined under applicable
federal law by the federal department of veterans’ affairs to be one hundred percent (100%)
disabled through a service-connected disability.; or
(d) Determined by the executive office of health and human services, or its designee, to be
disabled for purposes of Medicaid eligibility.
For purpose of this section, “fees” shall include all fees for parking, admittance, or other
user fees for playing golf. The term “fees” shall not include licensing fees, camping fees, picnic
table fees, or specialized facility use fees, including, but not limited to, fees for the use of equestrian
areas, performing arts centers, game fields, and mule shed.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000590
========
LC000590 - Page 2 of 3